Utah statutes.
53B-18-1101.   Higher Education Engineering Partnership.

(1)  Utah State University and Weber State University shall enter into a partnership agreement to jointly deliver a bachelor's degree in electrical engineering to meet the demand for electrical engineers in the state, including the demand at Hill Air force Base.

(2)  The partnership agreement may provide for:

(a)  a satellite location for the Utah State University electrical engineering program on a Weber State University campus, including the Davis campus; and

(b)  a curriculum using courses from:

(i)  Weber State University's electrical engineering technology and general education programs; and

(ii)  Utah State University's electrical engineering bachelor's degree program and other related programs.

